Utah statutes.
78A-1-106.   Transition clause -- Recodification of Title 78.
For purposes of a matter pending in any court beginning February 7, 2008
through August 31, 2008, citation to an appropriate section in the previous
Title 78, Judicial Code, shall be considered a proper citation to the
corresponding section in Title 78A, Judiciary and Judicial Administration, or
Title 78B, Judicial Code.
